Montana, session 2025, HB951.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Transfer of funds. No later than July 15, 2025, the state treasurer shall
transfer $30 million from the general fund to the local road and bridge account in the state special revenue fund
provided for in 15-70-132 as a one-time appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Effective date. [This act] is effective July 1, 2025.
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 951